Washington statutes.
RCW 10.99.070

Liability of peace officers.

A peace officer shall not be held liable in any civil action for an arrest based on probable cause, enforcement in good faith of a court order, or any other action or omission in good faith under this chapter arising from an alleged incident of domestic violence brought by any party to the incident.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 105 s 7.]